Washington statutes.
RCW 43.216.820

Working connections child care program—Notification of change in providers.

Beginning July 1, 2016, or earlier if a different date is provided in the omnibus appropriations act, when an applicant or recipient applies for or receives working connections child care benefits, the applicant or recipient is required to notify the department, within five days, of any change in providers.

[ 2018 c 52 s 3; 2015 3rd sp.s. c 7 s 7; 2012 c 251 s 2. Formerly RCW 43.216.139, 43.215.1352.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Intent—Finding—2018 c 52: See notes following RCW 43.216.909.

Finding—Intent—2015 3rd sp.s. c 7: See note following RCW 43.216.085.

Effective date—2012 c 251: See note following RCW 43.216.135.